Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,106
Public money or public funds; prompt payment.

The public money or public funds in the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall be paid promptly on the order of the custodial official or governmental unit depositing the public money or public funds in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 51;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 100;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 11.